Massachusetts, session 194th, H2945.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 91 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(f) Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (c) or any other general or special law to the
contrary, a teacher who is receiving a pension or retirement allowance from the teachers’
retirement system or the Boston retirement system and who has been retired for at least 12
consecutive months may be re-employed in a teaching position in a public school and may
continue to receive their full pension or retirement allowance for a period not to exceed 2
consecutive school years from the date of such re-employment. During the 2-year period, any
limitations on earnings or hours under this section shall not apply. A retired teacher who remains
employed in a teaching capacity beyond this 2-year period shall be subject to all applicable
of 2

earnings and hour limitations provided in this section. No additional creditable service or
adjustments to the retirement allowance shall accrue as a result of such re-employment.
SECTION 2. A retired teacher re-employed prior to the effective date of section 3, as set
forth in section 4, shall be permitted to complete the 2-year period authorized in subsection (f) of
section 91 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as seen in section 1.
SECTION 3. Subsection (f) of said section 91 of said chapter 32, added by section 1, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. Section 3 shall take effect 5 years after the effective date of this act.
of 2